Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
General Provisions

§ 7-3-1.
Official bond.

The secretary of state shall give bond to the state in the penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), with two or more sufficient sureties to be approved by the governor, conditioned according to law. When approved, said bond shall be filed and preserved in the office of the clerk of the supreme court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 117; 1880, § 202; 1892, § 4083; 1906, § 4635; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7473; 1930, § 6932; 1942, § 4192.

§ 7-3-3.
Office.

The secretary of state shall keep his office at the seat of the government, shall keep the same open Monday through Friday of each week for eight hours each day, and shall carefully preserve the official books, library, papers, records, and furniture belonging to his office.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 19, art. 5 (1); 1857, ch. 6, art. 10; 1871, § 115; 1880, § 203; 1892, § 4084; 1906, § 4636; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7474; 1930, § 6933; 1942, § 4193; Laws, 1904, ch. 168; Laws, 1964, ch. 542, § 4, eff from and after ten days after passage (approved June 11, 1964).

§ 7-3-5.
General duties.

The secretary of state shall keep a correct register of all official acts and proceedings of the governor, take charge of and safely keep in his office the returns of all elections by the people, and deliver as received the returns of election of all state officers to the speaker of the house of representatives on the first day of the next ensuing session of the legislature after the election. He shall lay all official documents before either branch of the legislature when required; he shall receive from the clerk of the house of representatives and the secretary of the senate, and shall carefully keep and preserve in his office, the journals, papers and proceedings of both houses of the legislature; and he shall carefully keep and preserve the enrolled acts and resolutions of the legislature, maps, charts and other property of the state remaining at the seat of government, the keeping of which is not otherwise provided for. He shall act as the custodian of the apostille issued by the department of authentications office of the Hague Conference on Private International Law and shall act as the authorizing official for public documents under the Hague Agreement of 1961.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 19, art. 5 (7); 1857, ch. 6, art. 12; 1871, § 118; 1880, § 204; 1892, § 4086; 1906, § 4638; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7476; 1930, § 6934; 1942, § 4194; Laws, 1981, ch. 337, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 318, eff from and after passage (approved March 3, 1983).

§ 7-3-7.
Seal.

The secretary of state shall have a seal which shall be in the form of a circle, with the image of an eagle in the center and around the margin the words “Secretary of State-State of Mississippi” and under the image of the eagle the word: “Official.”

The secretary of state shall affix the seal prescribed to every document where the same is required by law, and to every certificate and other official paper executed by him where necessary or proper. All documents authenticated with said seal and signed by said secretary of state shall be received as evidence in all courts, investigations, and proceedings authorized by law, and may be recorded in the same manner and with like effect as a deed. All copies of papers in the office of said secretary of state, certified by him and authenticated by said seal, shall be accepted in all matters equally in like manner as the original.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6935; 1942, § 4195; Laws, 1928, ch. 332.

§ 7-3-9.
May perform all duties required of notaries public.

The secretary of state shall have power to administer oaths and affirmations and to take acknowledgments under his seal of office, and to perform all other duties required of notaries public by commercial usage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6936; 1942, § 4196; Laws, 1928, ch. 332.

§ 7-3-11.
Custodian of “Mississippi Reports”.

The secretary of state shall take charge of the department reports and the “Mississippi Reports”, when printed and bound, and dispose of the same as required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4088; 1906, § 4640; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7478; 1930, § 6938; 1942, § 4198.

§ 7-3-13.
“Southern Reporter—Mississippi Cases” and department reports deposited in state library.

The Secretary of State shall cause ten (10) copies of each volume of the “Southern Reporter-Mississippi Cases” and ten (10) copies of the department reports to be provided to the State Library.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art. 17; 1871, § 122; 1880, § 208; 1892, § 4089; 1906, § 4641; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7479; 1930, § 6939; 1942, § 4199; Laws, 1989, ch. 321, § 4; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 12; Laws, 2002, ch. 351, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 7-3-15.
“Southern Reporter—Mississippi Cases” distributed.

The Secretary of State shall transmit, free of cost, one (1) copy of each volume of “Southern Reporter-Mississippi Cases” to the sheriff of each county of the state, for the county library, if the sheriff specifically requests copies of the volumes of “Southern Reporter-Mississippi Cases” in writing; one (1) copy of each volume thereof to each of the following educational institutions: Mississippi State University, Alcorn State University, Mississippi University for Women, Mississippi College School of Law, Delta State University, Jackson State University, Mississippi Valley State University, and the University of Southern Mississippi; ten (10) copies of each volume thereof to the University of Mississippi; and one (1) copy of each volume to the Library of Congress at Washington, D.C.

The above provisions of this section are made in recognition of benefits received through receipt at depository libraries and elsewhere in the State of Mississippi of public documents of the United States under the provisions of federal and state laws.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 265; 1892, § 4093; 1906, § 4645; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7483; 1930, § 6943; 1942, § 4203; Laws, 1936, 1st Ex. ch. 14; Laws, 1940, ch. 317; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 13; Laws, 2002, ch. 351, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 390, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 7-3-17.
“Mississippi Reports” exchanged for reports of other states and countries.

The secretary of state, under direction of the governor, shall transmit to the executive or other proper officer of each state and territory of the United States, and to any foreign government or country that will exchange its judicial reports therefor, copies of each volume of the “Mississippi Reports,” not exceeding five.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 266; 1892, § 4094; 1906, § 4646; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7484; 1930, § 6944; 1942, § 4204.

§ 7-3-19.
Books furnished University law school for exchange.

The dean of the law school of the University of Mississippi is hereby authorized and empowered, with the approval of the attorney general and secretary of state, to make requisitions to the secretary of state for the departmental reports and “Mississippi Reports” to exchange with other states for similar publications and make the same available in the law school library for the purpose of increasing its facilities.

The secretary of state is hereby authorized and empowered to furnish these publications upon requisition from the dean of the law school of the University of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4217; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 29.

§ 7-3-21.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1988, ch. 486, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§7-3-21. [Codes, 1892, § 4092; 1906, § 4644; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7482; 1930, § 6942; 1942, § 4202; Laws, 1940, ch. 317]

§ 7-3-23.
Acts of congress and other publications distributed.

The secretary of state shall, at the time of distributing the laws and journals, also transmit to the sheriff of each county, for the county library, one copy of the acts of congress, if there be so many remaining, and such other books, papers, maps, and documents as may be required by the legislature or governor to be distributed to the several counties.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 6, art. 19; 1871, § 124; 1880, § 210; 1892, § 4096; 1906, § 4648; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7486; 1930, § 6946; 1942, § 4206.

§ 7-3-25.
Books received from sheriffs distributed.

The secretary of state shall receive from the several sheriffs, who are required to return the same, all extra copies of the “Mississippi Reports” and digests, and he shall see that said sheriffs perform the duty required of them in this respect. If there be less than the required number of copies of any report or digest in the state library, he shall supply the deficiency from the reports so returned to him. Out of the residue of the reports so returned, he shall, as far as possible, supply each county with the books needed to complete the set belonging thereto and shall take the receipt of the sheriff therefor. Any books not thus disposed of shall be preserved in his office and sold as other like books.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 4100; 1906, § 4652; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7490; 1930, § 6950; 1942, § 4210.

§ 7-3-27.
Books and documents distributed and receipted for.

The secretary of state shall send, by suitable means at as cheap a rate as he can obtain, to the sheriffs of the several counties the books, documents, and papers required to be distributed to the various officers in their respective counties as soon as practicable after he receives the same; and shall likewise send to the various other distributees the books and documents to which they respectively are entitled. The sheriffs and other distributees shall send by mail, postpaid, or deliver to the secretary of state a certificate as evidence of the books, documents, and papers received, which, when received, shall be filed by the secretary of state in his office.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 125; 1880, § 211; 1892, § 4097; 1906, § 4649; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7487; 1930, § 6947; 1942, § 4207.

§ 7-3-29.
Expense of distributing books remunerated.

The secretary of state shall be remunerated for all expenses necessarily incurred in the distribution and transportation of books and documents, upon a verified statement of the same to the auditor of public accounts, who shall issue a warrant on the treasury for the required sum of money.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1871, § 127; 1880, § 213; 1892, § 4098; 1906, § 4650; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7488; 1930, § 6948; 1942, § 4208.

§§ 7-3-31 and 7-3-33.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§7-3-31. [Codes, 1942, § 4219; Laws, 1936, ch. 211]

§7-3-33. [Codes, 1942, § 4220; Laws, 1936, ch. 211]

§ 7-3-35.
Sale of current volumes.

The Secretary of State is authorized and empowered to sell current and future issues, and excess volumes at the cost of printing, binding and mailing. The funds realized by the Secretary of State from any sales of excess volumes shall be paid into the State General Fund in the manner prescribed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4221; Laws, 1936, ch. 211; Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 7-3-37.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 543, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§7-3-37. [Codes, 1892, § 4095; 1906, § 4647; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7485; 1930, § 6945; 1942, § 4205; Laws, 1989, ch. 321, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1989]

§ 7-3-39.
To publish constitutional amendments.

The Secretary of State shall have published in full each constitutional amendment two (2) weeks previous to an election at which the qualified electors shall vote on said amendments, in each county in each newspaper having a general circulation in the county, as defined in Section 13-3-31; or he shall have each amendment posted in three (3) public places in the county if all such newspapers in the county refuse to publish same at the price provided in Section 7-3-41.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7496; 1930, § 6951; 1942, § 4211; Laws, 1908, ch. 135; Laws, 1991, ch. 499 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1991).

§ 7-3-41.
Payment upon proof of publication.

The said amendments shall be paid for at the prevailing rate per insertion upon proof of publication being furnished to the secretary of state, the printing to be done in eight- or ten-point.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 7497; 1930, § 6952; 1942, § 4212; Laws, 1908, ch. 135; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved August 8, 1968).

§ 7-3-43.
Official character of officer certified.

The secretary of state shall furnish to any person desiring the same a certificate, under the seal of the state, signed by the governor and countersigned by himself, of the official character of any officer of this state; and such certificate shall be received in evidence in all courts.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 19, art. 11; 1857, ch. 6, art. 14; 1871, § 120; 1880, § 206; 1892, § 4099; 1906, § 4651; Hemingway’s 1917, § 7489; 1930, § 6949; 1942, § 4209.

§ 7-3-45.
Reports to be filed by constables.

Each and every constable being compensated in whole or in part on a fee basis shall file not later than April 15 of each year, with the Secretary of State, a true and accurate annual report on a form to be designed and supplied to each by the State Auditor of Public Accounts immediately after January 1 of each year, said form to include at least information showing gross receipts from all sources accruing as compensation to his office and disbursements occurring as necessary expenses involved solely in complying with laws governing the office. Said report shall be in triplicate, and each copy shall be sworn to and signed, and shall also be spread upon the minutes of the board of supervisors of the respective counties from which the report is made. Each such constable, upon resigning or leaving office otherwise before the expiration of term of office, shall submit a supplemental report as above, covering the final period of his term not included in a previous report.

Any person who shall knowingly and willfully fail to file the report as required by this section, or who shall, although filing such report, knowingly and willfully fail to disclose information required by this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 6955; 1942, § 4215; Laws, 1929, H. B. No. 35; Laws, 1966, ch. 301, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 368, § 1; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 5; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 18; Laws, 1985, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 535, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1996).

§ 7-3-47.
Penalty for failure or evasion.

On or before April 20 of each year, the Secretary of State shall notify by mail every constable being compensated in whole or in part on a fee basis who has failed to file the report required by Section 7-3-45; and on or before May 15 of each year, he will notify the Attorney General of the ones of same by name who still have not filed such report, and the attorney general shall thereupon prosecute such delinquent officers. If such report is not made by July 1 of the year, injunctive action and discovery in the chancery court of the residence of any such delinquent officer shall lie, and the Attorney General shall prosecute an action or actions in such court to obtain the proper information for each delinquent report.

Failure on the part of any such officer to file such report by May 15 or evasion of the cited section, either by failure to report properly or by false entry, shall constitute a misdemeanor and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment as the court may direct.

If any such constable compensated by fees shall fail to file such report by May 1 in any year, all fees, salaries, and other remuneration collected by such official from May 1 until the date when such report is filed shall be forfeited to the general fund of the county. Any such official going out of office at the end of his or her term shall be liable on his or her official bond for the refund of all allowances, fees, salaries, or other remuneration received by him or her from the county treasury during the last year of his or her term of office, if such report is not filed with the Secretary of State by May 1 of the following year.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, §§ 6505, 6956; 1942, §§ 4167, 4216; Laws, 1928, ch. 87; Laws, 1929, H. B. No. 35; Laws, 1932, ch. 193; Laws, 1938, Ex. ch. 25; Laws, 1940, ch. 255; Laws, 1948, ch. 267; Laws, 1950, ch. 258; Laws, 1952, ch. 218; Laws, 1958, ch. 343; Laws, 1966, chs. 300, 301, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 368, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 361, § 70, Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 19; Laws, 1996, ch. 535, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1996).

§ 7-3-49.
Data on natural resources assembled.

The secretary of state is hereby authorized and directed, in cooperation with the governor, other state officers, and civic and commercial organizations of the state, counties, and municipalities, to assemble the necessary information, facts, and data to be disseminated in such a manner as to advertise the natural resources, advantages, and commercial and industrial opportunities offered by the state of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4222; Laws, 1936, ch. 212.

§ 7-3-51.
Publication of data.

As soon as sufficient material is assembled for comprehensive exposition of the advantages offered by the state for commercial and industrial development, the same shall be classified and published in the form of booklets, folders, pamphlets, or other forms of printed matter suitable for the convenient distribution to the public.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4223; Laws, 1936, ch. 212.

§ 7-3-53.
Distribution of data.

It shall be the duty of the secretary of state to distribute said printed advertising matter among the several state officers and institutions as may be deemed proper and necessary for thorough dissemination of the information contained therein to the general public within and without the state. Ample supplies of such advertising matter shall be furnished to all civic bodies, boards of trade, chambers of commerce, and other similar organizations in municipalities throughout this state, and other states, when requested or when it is deemed advisable to accomplish the purpose stated in Section 7-3-49.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4225; Laws, 1936, ch. 212.

§ 7-3-55.
Continued publication discretionary.

Said publications and distribution shall be continued or renewed from time to time, in the discretion of the governor, as additional information is available for properly advertising the advantages of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4226; Laws, 1936, ch. 212.

§ 7-3-57.
Publication of the text of Chapter 9 of Title 75.

The Secretary of State is hereby authorized and directed to prepare and make available to the public, either in printed form or on the Secretary of State’s website, the text, with an index, of Chapter 9, Title 75, Mississippi Code of 1972, as amended.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 452, § 38; Laws, 2013, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 7-3-59.
Fees collected under Section 75-9-525; funding of Office of Secretary of State expenses; deposit of user charges and fees authorized under this section into State General Fund and use of monies so deposited.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, all fees collected by the Office of the Secretary of State under Section 75-9-525 shall be deposited in State Treasury Special Fund 3111, and shall be used to operate the activities of the Office of the Secretary of State as necessary to administer the filing and research provisions of Revised Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code and to pay to each chancery clerk such amounts as that clerk shall be owed under subsection (2) of this section. The expenditure of the funds deposited in this fund shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon requisition signed by the Office of the Secretary of State.

Through September 30, 2007, for each filing and indexing of a financing statement under Part 5 (Filing) of Title 75, Chapter 9 (Uniform Commercial Code Revised Article 9 – Secured Transactions), the Secretary of State shall remit the following fee to the chancery clerk of the Mississippi county, if any, indicated on the face of the financing statement as the domicile of the debtor, or, if no county is so indicated, the Mississippi county of the address of the debtor stated on the financing statement.

Five Dollars ($5.00), when the financing statement is communicated in writing, either in the standard form prescribed by the Secretary of State or not in the standard form so prescribed, plus Two Dollars ($2.00) for each additional debtor name more than one (1) required to be indexed.

Five Dollars ($5.00) if the financing statement is communicated by another medium authorized by filing-office rule.

From and after October 1, 2007, for each filing and indexing of a financing statement under Part 5 (Filing) of Title 75, Chapter 9 (Uniform Commercial Code Revised Article 9 – Secured Transactions), the Secretary of State shall remit the following fee to the County Voting Systems Assistance Bond Sinking Fund created under Section 3 of House Bill No. 562, 2006 Regular Session, in such amounts as specified in Section 3 of House Bill No. 562, 2006 Regular Session, and shall distribute the remainder of the fees to the “Help Mississippi Vote Fund” created in Section 23-15-169.7.

Five Dollars ($5.00), when the financing statement is communicated in writing, either in the standard form prescribed by the Secretary of State or not in the standard form so prescribed, plus Two Dollars ($2.00) for each additional debtor name more than one (1) required to be indexed.

Five Dollars ($5.00) if the financing statement is communicated by another medium authorized by filing-office rule.

The Secretary of State shall remit to each chancery clerk not less than monthly the amount owed under subsection (2) of this section. Each payment shall be accompanied by a detailed accounting of the transactions represented by that payment. However, from and after October 1, 2007, the Secretary of State shall remit to the County Voting Systems Assistance Bond Sinking Fund and the “Help Mississippi Vote Fund” not less than monthly the amount provided under subsection (2) of this section. Each payment shall be accompanied by a detailed accounting of the transactions represented by that payment.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of the Office of Secretary of State shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund to the Office of Secretary of State and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law and as determined necessary by the State Fiscal Officer for the purpose of paying principal and interest on bond issues for county voting systems, and shall not be authorized for expenditure by the Secretary of State to reimburse or otherwise defray the expenses of any office administered by the Secretary of State.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2001, ch. 495, § 36; Laws, 2006, ch. 309, § 19; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 44; Laws, 2017, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 7, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 23, 2017).